California statutes. Education Code
(a) In a fiscal year immediately after a fiscal year in which the amount of moneys in the Public School System Stabilization Account is equal to or exceeds 3 percent of the combined total of General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 41202 and allocated local proceeds of taxes pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 41202 for that fiscal year, a school district budget that is adopted or revised pursuant to Section 42127 shall not contain a combined assigned or unassigned ending general fund balance that is in excess of 10 percent of those funds.

(b) A county superintendent of schools may grant a school district under its jurisdiction an exemption from the requirements of subdivision (a) for up to two consecutive fiscal years within a three-year period if the school district provides documentation indicating that extraordinary fiscal circumstances, including, but not limited to, multiyear infrastructure or technology projects, substantiate the need for a combined assigned or unassigned ending general fund balance that is in excess of the amount described in subdivision (a). As a condition of receiving an exemption, a school district shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide a statement that substantiates the need for a combined assigned and unassigned ending general fund balance that is in excess of the amount described in subdivision (a).

(2) Identify the funding amounts in the budget adopted by the school district that are associated with the extraordinary fiscal circumstances.

(3) Provide documentation that no other fiscal resources are available to fund the extraordinary fiscal circumstances.

(c) This section shall
 not apply to a basic aid school district or to a small school district.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Basic aid school district” has the same meaning as in Section 42238.02.

(2) “Combined assigned or unassigned ending general fund balance” refers to assigned and unassigned moneys in the general fund accounts of school districts, including assigned and unassigned moneys in the Special Fund for Other Than Capital Outlay.

(3) “Small school district” means a school district with fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance.

(e) The Superintendent shall notify school districts and county offices of education whenever the conditions specified in subdivision (a) are met, and shall notify school districts and county offices of education when those conditions no longer exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 674, Sec. 1.   (SB 751)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

42127.1.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 42127, upon the disapproval of a school district budget by the county superintendent of schools, the county superintendent of schools shall call for the formation of a budget review committee unless the governing board of the school district and the county superintendent of schools agree to waive the requirement that a budget review committee be formed, and the department approves the waiver after determining that a budget review committee is not necessary. Upon the grant of a waiver, the county superintendent of schools has the authority and responsibility provided to a budget review committee in Section 42127.3. Upon approving a waiver of the budget review committee, the department shall ensure that a balanced budget is adopted for the school district by December 31.

(b) The budget review committee shall be composed of three persons selected by the governing board of the school district from a list of candidates provided to the governing board of the school district by the Superintendent. The list of candidates shall be composed of persons who have expertise in the management of a school district or county office of education. Their experience shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, the fiscal and educational aspects of local educational agency management.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) or any other provision of this article, with the approval of the Superintendent and the governing board of the school district, the county superintendent of schools may select and convene a regional review committee, consisting of persons having the expertise described in subdivision (b). The regional review committee shall operate in place of the
 budget review committee, in accordance with the provisions of this article governing budget review committees.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), members of the budget review committee shall be reimbursed by the department for their services and associated expenses while on official business at rates established by the
 Superintendent, subject to the approval of the executive director of the state board.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an employee of the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team who serves as a member of the budget review committee shall not be eligible for reimbursement by the department for their services and associated expenses while on official business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 23.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42127.2.

(a) The governing board of a school district shall, no later than five working days after the receipt of a candidate list from the Superintendent pursuant to Section 42127.1, select a budget review committee, and the Superintendent shall convene the committee no later than five working days following that selection. If the governing board of the school district fails to select a committee within the period of time permitted by this subdivision, the Superintendent instead shall select and convene the budget review committee no later than 10 working days after the district’s receipt of the candidate list.

(b) On or before November 30, the budget review committee shall review the
 proposed budget of the district and the underlying fiscal policies of the school district and transmit to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the county superintendent of schools, and the governing board of the school district either of the following:

(1) The recommendation that the school district budget be approved.

(2) A report disapproving the school district budget and setting forth recommendations for revisions to the school district budget that would enable the district to meet its financial obligations both in the current fiscal year and with regard to the district’s multiyear financial commitments.

(c) The Superintendent may extend the deadline set forth in subdivision (b) for a period of not more than 15 working days.

(d) The
 Superintendent shall establish criteria and procedures governing the performance by budget review committees of their duties pursuant to this section.

(e) Upon request of the county superintendent of schools, the Controller’s office may conduct an audit or review of the fiscal condition of the school district in order to assist a budget review committee or regional review committee for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 46.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

42127.3.

(a) If the budget review committee established pursuant to Sections 42127.1 and 42127.2 recommends approval of the school district budget, the county superintendent of schools shall accept the recommendation of the budget review committee and approve the budget.

(b) If the budget review committee established pursuant to Sections 42127.1 and 42127.2 disapproves the school district budget, the governing board of the school district, not later than five working days after receipt of the report described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42127.2, may submit a response to the Superintendent, including any revisions to the adopted final budget and any other proposed actions
 to be taken as a result of the recommendations of the budget review committee. Based upon the recommendations of the budget review committee and any response to those recommendations provided by the governing board of the school district, the Superintendent shall either approve or disapprove the budget. If the Superintendent disapproves the budget, he or she shall notify the governing board of the school district in writing of the reasons for that disapproval and, until the county superintendent of schools certifies the school district’s first interim report pursuant to Section 42131, the county superintendent of schools shall do the following as necessary:

(1) On or before December 31, develop and adopt, in consultation with the Superintendent and the governing board of the school district, a fiscal plan and budget that will govern the district and will allow the district to meet its financial obligations, both in the current fiscal year and
 with regard to the district’s multiyear financial commitments. The Superintendent may extend the date by which the county superintendent of schools is required to develop and adopt a fiscal plan and budget. The governing board of the school district shall govern the operation of the school district for the current fiscal year in accordance with that adopted budget.

(2) Cancel purchase orders, prohibit the issuance of nonsalary warrants, and otherwise stay or rescind any action that is inconsistent with the budget adopted pursuant to paragraph (1). The county superintendent of schools shall inform the governing board of the school district in writing of his or her justification for any exercise of authority under this paragraph.

(3) Monitor and review the operation of the school district.

(4) Determine the need for
 additional staff and may employ, subject to approval by the Superintendent, short-term analytical assistance or expertise to validate financial information if the school district staff does not have the expertise or staff.

(5) Require the school district to encumber all contracts and other obligations, to prepare appropriate cashflow analyses and monthly or quarterly budget revisions, and to appropriately record all receivables and payables.

(6) Determine whether there are any financial problem areas and may employ, subject to approval by the Superintendent, a certified public accounting firm to investigate financial problem areas.

(7) Withhold compensation of the members of the governing board of the school district and the superintendent of the school district for failure to provide requested financial information.
 A forfeiture may be appealed to the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42127.6.

(c) If, during the selection of the budget review committee or during the committee’s review of the budget, an agreement is reached between the governing board of the school district and the county superintendent of schools, and the school district revises its budget to comply with this agreement, the county superintendent of schools shall approve the school district budget and the budget review committee selection, or its review of the budget, shall be canceled.

(d) The school district shall pay 75 percent and the county office of education shall pay 25 percent of the actual administrative expenses incurred pursuant to subdivision (b), or costs associated with improving the district’s financial management practices. The Superintendent shall develop, and distribute to affected school
 districts and county offices of education, advisory guidelines regarding the appropriate amount of any fees charged pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) This section shall not be construed to authorize the county superintendent of schools to abrogate any provision of a collective bargaining agreement that was entered into by a school district prior to the date upon which the county superintendent of schools disapproved the budget of the school district pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 47.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

42127.4.

Until a school district receives approval of its budget under this article, the school district shall continue to operate on the basis of whichever of the following budgets contains a lower total spending authority:

(a) The last budget adopted or revised by the governing board of the school district for the prior fiscal year. 

(b) The unapproved budget for the current fiscal year, as adopted and revised by the governing board of the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1213, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

42127.5.

The governing board of any school district that reported a negative unrestricted fund balance or a negative cash balance in the annual report required by Section 42127 or in the audited annual financial statements required by Section 41020 shall include with the budget submitted in accordance with Section 42127 and the certifications required by Section 35015 a statement that identifies the reasons for the negative unrestricted fund balance or negative cash balance and the steps that have been taken to ensure that the negative balance will not occur at the end of the current fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1150, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

42127.6.

(a) (1) A school district shall provide the county superintendent of schools with a copy of a study, report, evaluation, or audit that was commissioned by the school district, the county superintendent, the Superintendent, and state control agencies and that contains evidence that the school district is showing fiscal distress under the standards and criteria adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 33127, or a report on the school district by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team. The county superintendent shall review and consider studies, reports, evaluations, or audits of the
 school district that contain evidence that the school district is demonstrating fiscal distress under the standards and criteria adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 33127 or that contain a finding by an external reviewer that the school district is at moderate or high risk of intervention based on the most common indicators of a school district needing intervention, as determined by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team. If these findings are made, the county superintendent of schools shall investigate the financial condition of the school district and determine if the school district may be unable to meet its financial obligations for the current or two subsequent fiscal years, or should receive a qualified or negative interim financial certification pursuant to Section 42131. If
 at any time during the fiscal year the county superintendent of schools determines that a school district may be unable to meet its financial obligations for the current or two subsequent fiscal years or if a school district has a qualified or negative certification pursuant to Section 42131, the county superintendent of schools shall provide a written notice of going concern determination to the governing board of the school district and the Superintendent and the basis for the determination. The notification shall include the assumptions used in making the determination and shall be available to the public. The county superintendent of schools shall report to the Superintendent on the financial condition of the school district and the county superintendent’s proposed remedial actions and shall do at least one of the following and all actions that are necessary to ensure that the school district meets its financial obligations:

(A) Assign a
 fiscal expert, paid for by the county superintendent of schools, to advise the school district on its financial problems.

(B) Conduct a study of the financial and budgetary conditions of the school district that includes, but is not limited to, a review of internal controls. If, in the course of this review, the county superintendent of schools determines that the county superintendent’s office requires analytical assistance or expertise that is not available through the school district, the county superintendent of schools may employ, on a short-term basis, with the approval of the Superintendent, staff, including certified public accountants, to provide the assistance and expertise. The school district shall pay 75 percent and the county office of education shall pay 25 percent of these staff costs.

(C) Direct the school district to submit a financial projection of all fund and
 cash balances of the district as of June 30 of the current year and subsequent fiscal years as the county superintendent of schools requires.

(D) Require the district to encumber all contracts and other obligations, to prepare appropriate cashflow analyses and monthly or quarterly budget revisions, and to appropriately record all receivables and payables.

(E) Direct the school district to submit a proposal for addressing the fiscal conditions that resulted in the determination that the school district may not be able to meet its financial obligations.

(F) Withhold compensation of the members of the governing board of the school district and the school district superintendent for failure to provide requested financial information. This action may be appealed to the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (b).

(G) Assign the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team to review teacher hiring practices, teacher retention rate, percentage of provision of highly qualified teachers, and the extent of teacher misassignment in the school district, to provide the school district with recommendations to streamline and improve the teacher hiring process, teacher retention rate, extent of teacher misassignment, and provision of highly qualified teachers, and to perform any or all of the duties prescribed in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, or to further review the causes that led to a finding of moderate or high risk of intervention pursuant to subdivision (a) and recommend corrective action. If a review team is assigned to a school district, the school district shall follow the recommendations of the team, unless the school district shows good cause for failure to do so. The County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team may not
 recommend an action that would abrogate a contract that governs employment.

(2) Any contract entered into by a county superintendent of schools for the purposes of this subdivision is subject to the approval of the Superintendent.

(3) An employee of a school district who provides information regarding improper governmental activity, as defined in Section 44112, is entitled to the protection provided pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 44110) of Chapter 1 of Part 25.

(b) Within five days of the county superintendent of schools making the determination specified in subdivision (a), a school district may appeal the basis of the determination and any of the proposed actions that the county superintendent of schools has indicated that the county superintendent of schools will take to further examine the
 financial condition of the school district. The Superintendent shall sustain or deny any or all parts of the appeal within 10 days.

(c) If after taking the actions identified in subdivision (a), the county superintendent of schools determines that a school district will be unable to meet its financial obligations for the current or subsequent fiscal year or if a school district experiences a significant fiscal event that is determined by the county superintendent of schools to have an immediate severe fiscal impact that will cause a school district to be unable to meet its financial
 obligations for the current or subsequent fiscal year, the county superintendent of schools shall notify the governing board of the school district, the superintendent of the school district, each recognized employee organization of the school district, each recognized parent organization of the school district, the
 Superintendent, and the president of the state board or the president’s designee in writing of that determination and the basis for that determination. The notification shall include the assumptions used in making the determination.

(d) Within five days of the county superintendent of schools making the determination specified in subdivision (c), a school district may appeal that determination to the Superintendent. The Superintendent shall sustain or deny the appeal within 10 days. If the governing board of the school district appeals the determination, the county superintendent of schools may stay any action of the governing board of the school district that the county superintendent of schools determines is inconsistent with the ability of the school district to meet its financial obligations for the current or subsequent fiscal year until resolution of the appeal by the Superintendent.

(e) If the appeal described in subdivision (d) is denied or not filed, or if the school district has a negative certification pursuant to Section 42131, the county superintendent of
 schools shall take all actions that are necessary to ensure that the school district meets its financial obligations, make a report to the Superintendent and the president of the state board, or the president’s designee, about the financial condition of the school district and remedial actions proposed by the county superintendent of
 schools, and shall, in consultation with the Superintendent, take at least one of the following actions:

(1) Develop and impose, in consultation with the Superintendent and the governing board of the school district, a budget revision that will enable the school district to meet its financial obligations in the current fiscal year.

(2) Stay or rescind any action that is determined to be inconsistent with the ability of the school district to meet its obligations for the current or subsequent fiscal year. This includes any actions up to the point that the subsequent year’s budget is approved by the county superintendent of schools. The county superintendent of schools shall inform the governing board of the school district in writing of the county superintendent’s justification for any exercise of authority under this paragraph.

(3) Assist in developing, in consultation with the governing board of the school district, a multiyear financial recovery plan that will enable the school district to meet its future obligations.

(4) Assist in developing, in consultation with the governing board of the school district, a budget for the subsequent fiscal year. If necessary, the county superintendent of schools shall continue to work with the governing board of the school district until the budget for the subsequent year is adopted by the governing board of the school district and approved by the county superintendent of schools.

(5) As necessary, appoint a fiscal adviser to perform any or all of the duties prescribed by this section on behalf of the county superintendent of schools.

(f) Any
 action taken by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (e) shall be accompanied by a notification that shall include the actions to be taken, the reasons for the actions, and the assumptions used to support the necessity for these
 actions and shall be made available to the public.

(g) This section does not authorize the county superintendent of schools to abrogate any provision of a collective bargaining agreement that was entered into by a school district before the date that the county superintendent of schools assumed authority pursuant to subdivision (e).

(h) The school district shall pay 75 percent and the county office of education shall pay 25 percent of the administrative expenses incurred pursuant to subdivision (e) or costs associated with improving the school district’s financial management practices. The Superintendent shall develop and distribute to affected school districts and county offices of education advisory guidelines regarding the appropriate amount of administrative expenses charged pursuant to this subdivision.

(i) Notwithstanding Section 42647 or 42650 or any other law, a county treasurer shall not honor any warrant if, pursuant to Sections 42127 to 42127.5, inclusive, or pursuant to this section, the county superintendent of schools or the Superintendent, as appropriate, has disapproved that warrant or the order on school district funds for which a warrant was prepared.

(j) Effective upon the certification of the election results for a newly organized school district pursuant to Section 35763, the county superintendent of schools may exercise any of the powers and duties of this section regarding the reorganized school district and the other affected school districts until the reorganized school district becomes effective for all purposes in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 35530) of Chapter 3 of Part 21.

(k) The Superintendent shall monitor the efforts of a county office of education in exercising its authority under this section and may exercise any of that authority if the Superintendent finds that the actions of the county superintendent of schools are not effective in resolving the financial problems of the school district. Upon a decision to exercise the powers of the county superintendent of schools, the county superintendent of schools is relieved of those powers assumed by the Superintendent, and shall provide support and assistance to the Superintendent in the exercise of those powers. The Superintendent shall also request that the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team identify the circumstances that led to the ineffectiveness of the county superintendent of schools in resolving the financial problems of the school district, and shall require the county office of education to demonstrate, in a manner determined by the Superintendent, remediation of those
 deficiencies. In addition to the actions taken by the county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent shall take further actions to ensure the long-term fiscal stability of the school district. The county office of education shall reimburse the Superintendent for all of the Superintendent’s costs in exercising the Superintendent’s authority under this subdivision. The Superintendent shall promptly notify the county superintendent of schools, the county board of education, the superintendent of the school district, the governing board of the school district, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature, and the Department of Finance of the Superintendent’s decision to exercise the authority of the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 24.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42127.8.

(a) The governing board provided for in subdivision (b) shall establish a unit to be known as the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team. The team shall consist of persons having extensive experience in school district budgeting, accounting, data processing, telecommunications, risk management, food services, pupil transportation, purchasing and warehousing, facilities maintenance and operation, and personnel administration, organization, and staffing. The Superintendent may appoint one employee of the department to serve on the unit. The unit shall be operated under the immediate direction of an appropriate county office of education selected jointly, in response to an application process, by the Superintendent and the president of the state board or the president of the state board’s designee.

(b) The unit established under subdivision (a) shall be selected and governed by a 25-member governing board consisting of one representative chosen by the California County Superintendents Educational Services Association from each of the 11 county service regions designated by the association, 11 superintendents of school districts chosen by the Association of California School Administrators from each of the 11 county service regions, one representative from the department chosen by the Superintendent, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges or the chancellor’s designee, and one member of a community college district governing board chosen by the chancellor. The governing board of the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team shall select a county superintendent of schools to chair the unit.

(c) (1) The Superintendent may request
 the unit to provide the assistance described in subdivision (b) of Section 1624, Section 1630, subdivision (b) of Section 42127.3, subdivision (e) of Section 42127.6, and Section 42127.9, and with the computation described in subdivision (a) of Section 42238.2, and to review the fiscal and administrative condition of any county office of education, school district, or charter school.

(2) A county superintendent of schools may request the unit to review the fiscal or administrative condition of a school district or charter school under the county superintendent of schools’ jurisdiction.

(3) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges may request the unit to provide the assistance described in Section 84041.

(d) In addition to the functions described in subdivision (c), the unit shall do all of the
 following:

(1) Provide fiscal management assistance, at the request of any school district, charter school, or county office of education, or, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 84041, at the request of any community college district. Each school district, charter school, or county office of education receiving that assistance shall be required to pay the personnel costs and travel costs incurred by the unit for that purpose, pursuant to rates determined by the governing board established under subdivision (b). The governing board annually shall ensure rate information is posted on the unit’s internet website.

(2) Facilitate training for members of the governing board of the school district, district and county superintendents, chief financial officers within the district, and schoolsite personnel whose primary responsibility is to address fiscal issues. Training services
 shall emphasize efforts to improve fiscal accountability and expand the fiscal competency of local agencies. The unit shall use state professional associations, private organizations, and public agencies to provide guidance, support, and the delivery of any training services.

(3) Facilitate fiscal management training through the 11 county service regions to county office of education staff to ensure that they develop the technical skills necessary to perform their fiduciary duties. The governing board established pursuant to subdivision (b) shall determine the extent of the training that is necessary to comply with this paragraph.

(4) Produce a training calendar that publicizes all of the fiscal training services that are being offered at the local, regional, and state levels, and post that training calendar on the unit’s internet website.

(e) The governing board shall reserve not less than 25 percent, nor more than 50 percent, of its revenues each year for expenditure for the costs of contracts and professional services as management assistance to school districts or county superintendents of schools in which the board determines that a fiscal emergency exists.

(f) The governing board established under subdivision (b) may levy an annual assessment against each county office of education that elects to participate under this section in an amount not to exceed twenty cents ($0.20) per unit of total average daily attendance for all school districts within the county. The revenues collected pursuant to that assessment shall be applied to the expenses of the unit.

(g) The governing board established under subdivision (b) may pay to the department, from any
 available funds, a reasonable amount to reimburse the department for actual administrative expenses incurred in the review of the budgets and fiscal conditions of school districts, charter schools, and county superintendents of schools.

(h) When employed as a fiscal adviser by the department pursuant to Section 1630, employees of the unit established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be considered employees of the department for purposes of errors and omissions liability insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 19.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42127.9.

(a) No later than five days after a school district receives notice of any change or changes adopted by the county superintendent of schools in the school district’s budget pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42127.3, subdivision (e) of Section 42127.6, or subdivision (b) of Section 42131, the governing board of the school district may submit an appeal to the Superintendent, based upon the contention that the change or changes would do one or more of the following:

(1) Exceed the financial or program changes necessary to allow the school district to meet its financial obligations in the current fiscal year and with regard to its multiyear financial commitments. It is the intent of the Legislature that any change or changes adopted by the county superintendent
 of schools in a school district’s budget minimize, to the extent possible, any impact upon the educational program of the school district.

(2) Require reductions that are unnecessary in view of other reductions that are proposed by the governing board of the school district and that reasonably can be expected to be realized.

(3) Make one or more changes in the school district’s operations that are inconsistent with any provision of state or federal law.

(b) No later than five days after receiving that appeal, the Superintendent, with the concurrence of the president of the state board or the president’s designee, shall deny or uphold the appeal. If the appeal is denied, the school district shall implement the change or changes adopted by the county superintendent of schools. If the appeal is upheld, the
 Superintendent may revise the change or changes adopted by the county superintendent of schools or issue guidelines governing the manner in which the governing board of the school district or the county superintendent of schools shall be required to change the school district budget.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 51.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42128.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a county superintendent of schools shall not make an apportionment of state, local,
 or county school
 moneys for the current fiscal year for a school district or charter school if the governing board of the school district or the school district or the governing body of the charter school or the charter school neglects or refuses to do any of the following:

(1) Adopt a local control and accountability plan pursuant to Section 52060 or 47606.5.

(2) Adopt an annual update to a local control and accountability plan pursuant to Section 52061 or 47606.5.

(3) Adopt or submit a school district or charter school budget pursuant to this article or Section 47604.33.

(4) Submit reports pursuant to Section 42130 or 47604.33.

(b) A county superintendent of schools shall withhold apportionments pursuant to subdivision (a), including previously withheld apportionments for the current fiscal year, until the requirements listed in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) are met and
 shall notify the appropriate county official that the county superintendent of schools shall not approve any warrants issued by the school district or charter school.

(c) If the governing board of a school district or a school district or a governing body of a charter school or a charter school is unable to fulfill one or more requirements described in subdivision (a) due to any of the events described in subdivision (a) of Section 46392, the
 governing board of the school district or the governing body of the charter school shall, at the earliest opportunity after the event no longer exists, fulfill those requirements and shall submit to the county superintendent of schools and the Superintendent the following information:

(1) A description of the emergency event.

(2) The date that the requirements described in subdivision (a) were met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 25.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42129.

(a) School districts, county offices of education, and charter schools shall transmit to the
 Superintendent, on a timely basis, local control and accountability plans, annual updates to local control and accountability plans, all budget reports, prior year expenditure reports, qualified and negative financial status reports, program cost accounting reports, certifications, and audit reports as required by subdivision (l) of Section 1240, Sections 1621, 1623, 1628, 41020,
 42100, 42127, 42131, 47604.33, 47606.5, 52060, 52061, 52066, and 52067, Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56836) of Part 30 of Division 4, and Sections 7906 and 7907 of the Government Code, and reports used to calculate the first, second, and annual principal
 apportionments, as applicable.
 If a plan, update, or report is not submitted to the Superintendent within 14 days after the submission date prescribed in the statute or specified by the Superintendent, the Superintendent may direct the county auditor or charter school to
 withhold payment of any stipend, expenses, benefits, or salaries and wages of the district superintendent, county superintendent of schools, charter school administrator, or members of the governing board, as appropriate. The payments shall be withheld until the delinquent reports have been submitted to the
 Superintendent. If a county superintendent of schools performs the functions of the county auditor, the Superintendent may direct the county superintendent of schools to withhold the payments specified in this
 subdivision.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), school districts and charter schools shall transmit to the county superintendent of schools, on a timely basis, local control and accountability plans, annual updates to local control and accountability plans, all budget reports, prior year expenditure reports, qualified and negative financial status reports, program cost accounting reports, certifications, and audit reports as required by Sections 41020, 42100, 42127, 42131, 47604.33, 47606.5, 52060, and 52061, Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56836) of Part 30 of Division 4, and Section 7906 of the Government Code, and reports used to calculate the first, second, and annual principal apportionments, as applicable. If a plan, update, or report is not submitted to the county
 superintendent of schools within 14 days after the submission date prescribed in the statute or specified by the Superintendent, the county superintendent of schools shall direct the county auditor or charter school to withhold payment of any stipend, expenses, benefits, or salaries and wages of the district superintendent, charter school administrator, or members of the governing board, as appropriate. The payments shall be withheld until the delinquent reports have been submitted to the county superintendent of schools. If a county superintendent of schools performs the functions of the county auditor, the county superintendent of schools shall withhold the payments specified in this subdivision.
